Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1572.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1703-H(b)(5) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.674, No.56), is amended to read:Section 1703-H. Tax credit certificates.* * *(b) Review, recommendation and approval.--* * *(5) In granting tax credit certificates under this article, the Department of Community and Economic 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Development:(i) Shall not grant more than $20,000,000 in tax credit certificates in any fiscal year exclusive of any tax credit certificates not awarded or returned from previous fiscal years.(ii) Shall not grant more than [$500,000] $1,500,000 in tax credit certificates to a single qualified taxpayer in any fiscal year.(iii) Shall assure that credits are awarded in an equitable manner to each region in this Commonwealth. However, credits allocated to a region that are unclaimed shall be promptly reallocated to eligible projects in other regions.Section 2. The amendment of section 1703-H(b)(5) of the act shall apply to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1572PN1885 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516